New Jersey, session 222, A901.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A school district shall include instruction on the dangers of fentanyl and xylazine in an appropriate place in the curriculum of students in grades six through 12 as part of the districts implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Comprehensive Health and Physical Education. b.  The instruction shall include, at a minimum, information on: (1)   fentanyl and xylazine abuse prevention; (2)   fentanyl and xylazine poisoning awareness; (3)   the dangers of synthetic opioids, including fentanyl or any substituted derivative of fentanyl, xylazine, and counterfeit drugs; (4)   recognizing the symptoms of fentanyl and xylazine poisoning; (5)   how to respond to a fentanyl or xylazine poisoning emergency; and (6)   laws that provide immunity or other protections for persons who report drug or alcohol use, or who seek medical treatment for drug or alcohol poisoning or overdoses for themselves or others. c.     The Commissioner of Education shall provide school districts with age-appropriate resources designed to implement the requirement established pursuant to subsection a. of this section. Information for instruction on the dangers of fentanyl and xylazine shall utilize information and resources provided by: (1)   the National Institutes of Health; (2)   the United States Drug Enforcement Administration; (3)   the United States Department of Health and Human Services; (4)   the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention; or (5)   any State, county, or municipal department or agency. d.    The Department of Education shall post and maintain on its Internet website information on: (1)   instruction on the dangers of fentanyl and xylazine provided to school districts pursuant to subsection c. of this section; (2)   awareness and safety materials for school staff, students, and parents on opioid poisoning prevention; (3)   outreach organizations with resources concerning opioid awareness and opioid poisoning prevention; and (4)   preventative mental health resources available from applicable federal, State, county, or municipal departments and agencies. e.  The State Board of Education shall review and update the New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Comprehensive Health and Physical Education to ensure instruction on the dangers of fentanyl and xylazine is incorporated in an appropriate place in the curriculum of students in grades six through 12 as required pursuant to this section. 2.    The Commissioner of Education, in consultation with local school districts and the Commissioner of Health, shall submit an annual report to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), on the implementation of the curriculum requirement established pursuant to section 1 P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). The report shall include an evaluation of the effectiveness of the curriculum in reducing and preventing the use of, or poisoning from, fentanyl, xylazine, and similar drugs among youth, and recommendations to improve and enhance the effectiveness of the curriculum. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the date of enactment.